Wisconsin, session 2025, SB257.
do enact as follows:SB257,11Section 1. 995.15 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB257,2,132995.15 (1) (b) “Electronic vaping device” has the meaning given in s. 134.65 3(1a) (b) means a device that delivers an aerosolized or vaporized liquid for 4inhalation from the application of a heating element to a liquid containing nicotine 5from any source and includes an e-cigarette, e-cigar, e-pipe, vape pen, or e-hookah. 6“Electronic vaping device” includes a component, part, or accessory of the device 7and includes a liquid containing nicotine from any source that may be aerosolized or 8vaporized by such device, regardless of whether the liquid is sold with the product 9or separately. “Electronic vaping device” does not include a battery or battery 10charger when sold separately. “Electronic vaping device” does not include drugs, 11devices, or combination products authorized for sale by the U.S. food and drug 12administration, as those terms are defined by the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic 13Act.SB257,2,1414